tests/morphophonology/dorsalobstruents.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../../uzb.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../uzb.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] intervocalic stem-final q voicing":
    baliq<n><nom> : baliq
    baliq<n><px3sp><nom> : baligʻi
    bayroq<n><px3sp><nom> : bayrogʻi

  "[twol] intervocalic stem-final q voicing doesn't affect verbs":
    chiq<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : chiqadi

  "[twol] intervocalic stem-final k voicing":
    suyak<n><nom> : suyak
    suyak<n><px3sp><nom> : suyagi
    mushuk<n><nom> : mushuk
    mushuk<n><px3sp><nom> : mushugi

  "[twol] no voicing when not intervocalic":
    bank<n><px3sp><nom> : banki
    disk<n><px3sp><nom> : diski
    barq<n><px3sp><nom> : barqi

  "[twol] -{G}an after most consonants":
    ket<v><iv><past><p1><sg> : ketganman

  "[twol] -{G}an after k":
    tik<v><tv><past><p1><sg> : tikkanman

  "[twol] -{G}an after q":
    chiq<v><iv><past><p1><sg> : chiqqanman
    qishloq<n><dat> : qishloqqa

  "[twol] -{G}an after gʻ":
    yigʻ<v><tv><past><p1><sg> : yigʻganman
